Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2219.01
Valuation services, defined.

Valuation services means services pertaining to an aspect of property value, including a service performed by real property appraisers.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 38;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 25;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 67.